Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.110

Equivalency courses recognition, distribution, and access.

(1) An interdistrict cooperative agreement between all participating school districts in a skill center under RCW 28A.245.010 must stipulate that any approved state and local equivalency courses offered by the host school district must be honored as equivalency courses by all school districts participating in the skill center.

(2) The list of approved local and state equivalency courses of the host school district must be provided by the host district to participating districts on an annual basis by September 1st.

(3) Students served at any core, branch, or satellite skill center campus must have access to academic credit for any approved local or state equivalency courses offered at those sites and in accordance with transcription requirements in RCW 28A.230.097.

[ 2023 c 407 s 1.]